cs: Sportovní potřeby > Atletické sporty > Víceúčelové atletické vybavení > Žebříky a překážky na nácvik rychlosti a hbitosti: Koordinační žebříky; Slalomové tyče a tréninkové branky; Překážky pro trénink rychlosti a obratnosti
da: Sportsartikler > Atletik > Træningsudstyr > Stiger og hække til hurtighedstræning: Agilitystiger; Agilitystænger og -porte; Agilityhække
sv: Sportartiklar > Idrott och sport > Idrottsutrustning för allmänt bruk > Häckar och stegar för hastighets- och rörlighetsträning: Koordinationsstegar; Slalompinnar och portar; Snabbhetshäckar
ko: 스포츠용품 > 운동 > 다용도 운동 장비 > 속도 및 민첩성 운동용 사다리/허들: 민첩성 사다리; 민첩성 훈련 폴 및 게이트; 스피드 및 민첩성 허들
it: Articoli sportivi > Sport > Attrezzature sportive generiche > Scale e ostacoli per velocità e agilità: Scalette per agilità; Paletti e porte per allenamento agilità; Ostacoli per velocità e agilità
nl: Sportartikelen > Lichaamssporten > Algemene atletiekbenodigdheden > Snelheids- en behendigheidsladders en -horden: Behendigheidsladders; Behendigheidsstokken en -poortjes; Snelheids- en behendigheidshorden
de: Sportartikel > Athletik > Allgemeine Sportartikel > Leitern & Hürden für Geschwindigkeits- & Koordinationstraining: Koordinationsleitern; Agility-Trainingsstangen & -Tore; Speed- & Agility-Hürden
lt-LT: Sporto prekės > Atletika > Bendrosios paskirties sportinė įranga > Greičio ir vikrumo treniruočių kopėtėlės ir kliūtys: Vikrumo kopetėlės; Vikrumo treniruočių stulpai ir varteliai; Greičio ir vikrumo barjerai
tr: Spor Malzemeleri > Spor Ekipmanları > Genel Amaçlı Spor Malzemeleri > Hız ve Çeviklik Merdivenleri ve Engelleri: Çeviklik merdivenleri; Çeviklik antrenman çubukları ve kapıları; Hız ve çeviklik engelleri
ja: スポーツ用品 > スポーツ競技 > スポーツ競技用多目的器材 > トレーニング用ラダー・ハードル: アジリティラダー; アジリティ用トレーニングポール・ゲート; スピード・アジリティ用ハードル
zh-TW: 體育用品 > 競技體育 > 一般體育配備 > 繩梯和跳欄: 敏捷梯; 敏捷訓練桿與拱門; 速度與敏捷訓練欄架
zh-CN: 体育用品 > 田径 > 通用体育用品 > 速度/敏捷训练梯/障碍栏: 敏捷梯; 敏捷训练标志杆与标志门; 速度与敏捷训练跨栏
nb: Sportsutstyr > Friidrett > Treningsutstyr for generelle formål > Stiger og hindre for hurtighets- og agilitytrening: Agilitystiger; Staver og porter for smidighetstrening; Hekker for fart og smidighet
ro-RO: Articole sportive > Atletism > Echipament sportiv de uz general > Scări și obstacole pentru antrenamente de viteză și agilitate: Scări de agilitate; Stâlpi și porți pentru antrenament de agilitate; Garduri pentru viteză și agilitate
pt-PT: Artigos de desporto > Atividade desportiva > Equipamento desportivo geral > Obstáculos e escadas de velocidade e agilidade: Escadas de agilidade; Postes e portas de treino de agilidade; Barreiras de velocidade e agilidade
fi: Urheilutarvikkeet > Urheilu > Yleistarvikkeet urheiluun > Tikkaat ja aidat nopeus- ja ketteryysharjoitteluun: Koordinaatiotikkaat; Ketteryyskepit ja -portit; Nopeus- ja ketteryysaidat
sk-SK: Športový tovar > Atletika > Športové vybavenie na všeobecné použitie > Rebríky a prekážky pre rýchlosť a obratnosť: Rebríky na agility; Tyče a brány na tréning agility; Prekážky na tréning rýchlosti a obratnosti
vi: Dụng cụ thể thao > Điền kinh > Thiết bị thể thao thông dụng > Thang và rào giảm tốc độ: Thang tập độ linh hoạt; Cọc & cổng tập độ linh hoạt; Rào nhảy tập tốc độ và độ linh hoạt
hu: Sportszerek > Atlétika > Általános célú atlétikai felszerelések > Gyorsaság és ügyességi létrák és gátak: Agility létrák; Agility edzőrudak és kapuk; Sebességfejlesztő és agility gátak
th: อุปกรณ์กีฬา > การกีฬา > อุปกรณ์กีฬาสำหรับวัตถุประสงค์ทั่วไป > บันไดและสิ่งกีดขวางสำหรับความเร็วและความคล่องตัว: บันไดฝึกความคล่องตัว; เสาและซุ้มฝึกความคล่องตัว; รั้วกระโดดฝึกความเร็วและความคล่องตัว
ru: Спортивные товары > Соревновательный спорт > Спортивное оборудование общего назначения > Лестницы и барьеры для спортивных тренировок: Координационные лестницы; Стойки и ворота для тренировки координации; Барьеры для тренировки скорости и координации
bg-BG: Спортни стоки > Спортни занимания > Спортно оборудване с общо предназначение > Стълби и препятствия за скорост и ловкост: Стълби за ловкост; Тренировъчни колчета и врати за ловкост; Препятствия за скорост и ловкост
pl: Sprzęt sportowy > Sport > Sprzęt ogólnosportowy > Płotki i drabinki do ćwiczenia zwinności: Drabinki koordynacyjne; Tyczki i bramki do treningu zwinności; Płotki koordynacyjne i treningowe
fr: Équipements sportifs > Divers sports > Matériel de sport > Haies et échelles d’entraînement: Échelles d’agilité; Jalons et portes d’entraînement à l’agilité; Haies de vitesse et d’agilité
hr-HR: Sportska oprema > Atletika > Sportska oprema opće namjene > Ljestve i prepone za brzinu i agilnost: Ljestve za agilnost; Štapovi i vrata za vježbanje agilnosti; Prepone za brzinu i agilnost
pt-BR: Artigos esportivos > Artigos para prática de esportes > Equipamento para esportes em geral > Escadas e obstáculos para velocidade e agilidade: Escadas de agilidade; Bastões e arcos de agilidade para treinamento; Barreiras de velocidade e agilidade
es: Equipamiento deportivo > Equipamiento para atletismo > Equipamiento para atletismo de uso general > Escaleras y vallas para agilidad y velocidad: Escaleras de agilidad; Postes y arcos para entrenamiento de agilidad; Vallas de velocidad y agilidad
el: Αθλητικά είδη > Αθλητισμός > Αθλητικός εξοπλισμός γενικής χρήσης > Σκάλες & εμπόδια ταχύτητας & ευκινησίας: Σκάλες ευκινησίας; Πάσσαλοι και πύλες προπόνησης ευκινησίας; Εμπόδια ταχύτητας και ευκινησίας
sl-SI: Športna oprema > Šport > Splošna športna oprema > Lestve in ovire za hitrost in agilnost: Lestve za agilnost; Palice in vrata za trening agilnosti; Ovire za hitrost in agilnost
en: Sporting Goods > Athletics > General Purpose Athletic Equipment > Speed & Agility Ladders & Hurdles: Agility Ladders; Agility Training Poles & Gates; Speed & Agility Hurdles